Maine, session 132, LD889.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §3110, sub-§2, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 412, Pt. VV, §1, is
amended to read:
2. Authorization required. Before providing any information pursuant to this
section, the department must receive express authorization from the recipient of assistance
agreeing to the release of that information in accordance with federal and state law this
section. The department shall develop a simplified process to give the recipient of
assistance the choice to opt out of authorizing the a release of information pursuant to this
section at the time of application or recertification for assistance under this subtitle or at
another time of the individual's choice.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 1 - 132LR1895(03)